Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2124YC (4) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âIncreasing Student Financial Aid Awareness Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 4 requires: 5 1. âBureauâ means the bureau of Iowa college aid of the 6 department of education. 7 2. âCorporationâ means the Iowa student loan liquidity 8 corporation. 9 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Student loan information. 10 The corporation shall provide the following information to 11 the bureau: 12 1. An estimate of the annual percentage rate of the federal 13 direct plus loan as well as the assumptions used by the 14 corporation to prepare the estimate. The corporation shall 15 provide this information annually after the interest rate for a 16 federal direct plus loan is established. 17 2. The address of the corporationâs internet site that 18 includes information on possible annual percentage rates for 19 a college family loan and partnership loan offered by the 20 corporation and the disclosures required by 34 C.F.R. Â§601.11. 21 The corporation shall notify the bureau when the annual 22 percentage rate for the college family loan or partnership loan 23 changes. 24 3. The address of the corporationâs internet site that 25 includes a chart comparing the terms and conditions of the 26 federal direct plus loan with those of the college family loan 27 and the partnership loan. The corporation shall notify the 28 bureau when any information on the chart is changed. 29 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Analysis of student loan 30 information. 31 Upon receiving information from the corporation as required 32 by section 261K.2, the bureau shall do all of the following: 33 1. Provide the estimate and assumptions required by section 34 261K.2, subsection 1, to the superintendent of banking. The 35 -1- LSB 2124YC (4) 91 je/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ superintendent shall review the estimate and assumptions and 1 report the superintendentâs findings as to the accuracy and 2 validity of the estimate and assumptions to the bureau. 3 2. Using the report provided pursuant to subsection 1 and 4 any other resources available to the bureau, determine if 5 the information included in the chart described in section 6 261K.2, subsection 3, is accurate. If the bureau determines 7 any information is inaccurate, the bureau shall notify the 8 corporation of the inaccuracy and the manner in which the 9 inaccuracy can be corrected. 10 3. Compare the estimated annual percentage rate for the 11 federal direct plus loan to the annual percentage rates for 12 the college family loan and the partnership loan and determine 13 if the college family loan or the partnership loan may offer a 14 lower annual percentage rate than the federal direct plus loan. 15 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.4 Online statement. 16 If the bureau determines, based on section 261K.3, 17 subsection 3, that the college family loan or the partnership 18 loan may offer a lower annual percentage rate than the federal 19 direct plus loan, the bureau shall publish on the bureauâs 20 internet site a statement that contains the information 21 required by this section. The bureau shall remove the 22 statement if a change in annual percentage rate results in 23 the college family loan or the partnership loan no longer 24 having the lower rate. The statement must include all of the 25 following: 26 1. An explanation that the supplemental student loan 27 program offered by the state of Iowa, which includes the 28 college family loan and the partnership loan, offers an 29 annual percentage rate that is lower than the estimated annual 30 percentage rate of the federal direct plus loan. 31 2. The estimated annual percentage rate of the federal 32 direct plus loan and the address of the corporationâs internet 33 site described in section 261K.2, subsection 2. The bureau 34 shall update this information as applicable interest rates and 35 -2- LSB 2124YC (4) 91 je/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ annual percentage rates change. 1 3. The address of the corporationâs internet site described 2 in section 261K.2, subsection 3. 3 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.5 Information required in offers 4 of financial aid. 5 By October 1 each year, if the bureau determines, based on 6 section 261K.3, subsection 3, that the college family loan 7 or the partnership loan may offer a lower annual percentage 8 rate than the federal direct plus loan, the bureau shall 9 send to each institution of higher education in this state 10 eligible to receive funds through the college family loan or 11 the partnership loan offered by the corporation the information 12 required by this section. Each institution shall include the 13 information in all offers of financial aid sent to prospective 14 students or their families. The bureau shall notify each 15 institution if a change in annual percentage rate results in 16 the college family loan or the partnership loan no longer 17 having the lower rate, in which case the institution shall no 18 longer be required to include the information unless notified 19 otherwise by the bureau. 20 1. An explanation as described in section 261K.4, 21 subsection 1. 22 2. The address of the bureauâs internet site that includes 23 the statement required by section 261K.4. 24 3. The address of the corporationâs internet site described 25 in section 261K.2, subsection 3. 26 4. A statement that students and their families should 27 utilize federal loan programs for students before considering a 28 federal direct plus loan, college family loan, or partnership 29 loan. 30